Alabama, session 2026rs, HB196.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 16-1-25 of the Code of Alabama 1975,
is amended to read as follows:
"§16-1-25
(a) All city and county public school systems and all
Page 1

(a) All city and county public school systems and all
HB196 INTRODUCED
public institutions of higher education as defined by Section
16-5-1 and all divisions of public institutions of higher
education shall grant military recruiters of the United States
Armed Forces and United States Department of Homeland Security
the same information and access to students and campus
facilities as the institution grants to prospective employers
of students or to postsecondary institutions.
(b) In addition to the access provided in subsection
(a), all city and county public high schools shall annually
designate one school day during the fall semester for military
recruiters to administer the Armed Services Vocational
Aptitude Battery (ASVAB) to students on campus. The high
school shall provide appropriate testing accommodations and
the ASVAB shall be voluntary for students."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2